Washington statutes.
RCW 43.20.030

State board of health—Members—Chair—Staff support—Executive director, confidential secretary—Compensation and travel expenses of members.

The state board of health shall be composed of ten members. These shall be the secretary or the secretary's designee and nine other persons to be appointed by the governor, including four persons experienced in matters of health and sanitation, one of whom is a health official from a federally recognized tribe; an elected city official who is a member of a local health board; an elected county official who is a member of a local health board; a local health officer; and two persons representing the consumers of health care. Before appointing the city official, the governor shall consider any recommendations submitted by the association of Washington cities. Before appointing the county official, the governor shall consider any recommendations submitted by the Washington state association of counties. Before appointing the local health officer, the governor shall consider any recommendations submitted by the Washington state association of local public health officials. Before appointing one of the two consumer representatives, the governor shall consider any recommendations submitted by the state council on aging. The chair shall be selected by the governor from among the nine appointed members. The department of health shall provide necessary technical staff support to the board. The board may employ an executive director and a confidential secretary, each of whom shall be exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW.

Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5072; 2006 c 238 s 1. Prior: 1984 c 287 s 75; 1984 c 243 s 2; (1993 c 492 s 255 repealed by 1995 c 43 s 16); 1970 ex.s. c 18 s 11; 1965 c 8 s 43.20.030; prior: 1921 c 7 s 56, part; RRS s 10814, part.]

NOTES:

Short title—2006 c 238: "This act shall be known as the Sue Crystal memorial act." [ 2006 c 238 s 2.]

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1970 ex.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 43.20A.010.